Maryland, session 2026, SB0912.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
23–202.
(a) (1) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the Administration and the
Secretary shall establish an emissions control program in the State in accordance with the
federal Clean Air Act.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0912*

SENATE BILL 912
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the emissions control
program shall provide for a biennial exhaust emissions test and emissions equipment and
misfueling inspection for all vehicles of the 1977 model year and each model year thereafter.
23–206.2.
(a) (1) A motor vehicle for which special registration plates have been issued
under § 13–616 of this article is exempt from the mandatory inspections required by this
subtitle if:
(i) All of the owners of the motor vehicle meet the disability
requirements of § 13–616(b)(1) of this article;
(ii) The motor vehicle is driven 5,000 miles or less annually; and
(iii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify the following:
(i) That the owner of the motor vehicle meets the disability
requirements of § 13–616(b)(1) of this article;
(ii) That the motor vehicle has been issued a special disabled
person’s registration number and special registration plates under § 13–616 of this article;
(iii) That the motor vehicle is driven 5,000 miles or less annually; and
(iv) The motor vehicle’s odometer reading at the time of the
certification.
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
(b) (1) A motor vehicle owned by an individual who is at least 70 years of age
at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle is exempt from the
mandatory inspections required by this subtitle if:
(i) All of the owners of the motor vehicle are at least 70 years of age
at the time of the scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle;
(ii) The motor vehicle is being driven 5,000 miles or less annually;
and
(iii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.

SENATE BILL 912 3
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify the following:
(i) That all of the owners of the motor vehicle are at least 70 years
of age at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle;
(ii) That the motor vehicle is being driven 5,000 miles or less
annually; and
(iii) The motor vehicle’s odometer reading at the time of the
certification.
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
(c) (1) A motor vehicle owned by at least one active duty member of the
uniformed services at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle is
exempt from the mandatory inspections required by this subtitle if:
(i) An owner of the motor vehicle who is a member of the uniformed
services has received official orders:
1. For deployment outside the United States; or
2. To a duty station in a jurisdiction that is not subject to a
vehicle emissions control inspection and maintenance program; and
(ii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify that at least one owner of the motor
vehicle has received official orders for deployment outside the United States or to a duty
station in a jurisdiction that is not subject to a vehicle emissions control inspection and
maintenance program.
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
(d) (1) A MOTOR VEHICLE IS EXEMPT FROM THE MANDATORY
INSPECTIONS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE:
(I) WAS REGISTERED AS A HISTORIC MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER §
13–936 OF THIS ARTICLE BEFORE JULY 1, 2025; AND
(II) ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2025, NO LONGER QUALIFIES AS A
HISTORIC MOTOR VEHICLE SOLELY AS A RESULT OF THE CHANGE TO THE

SENATE BILL 912
DEFINITION OF “HISTORIC MOTOR VEHICLE” ENACTED BY CHAPTER 604 OF THE
ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2025.
(2) IN ORDER TO QUALIFY FOR AN EXEMPTION UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE SHALL CERTIFY
THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS REGISTERED AS A HISTORIC MOTOR VEHICLE
UNDER § 13–936 OF THIS ARTICLE BEFORE JULY 1, 2025.
(3) THE CERTIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE MADE ON A FORM PROVIDED BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(E) The Administrator may adopt regulations as necessary to administer or
enforce the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.